Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.108

Tribal consultation training and schedule.

(1) The legislature recognizes that federal law requires some school districts to consult with federally recognized tribes on issues affecting American Indian and Alaska Native students. Under the federal every student succeeds act, this consultation requirement is intended to "ensure timely and meaningful consultation on issues affecting American Indian and Alaska Native students." The legislature acknowledges that many school district staff have not had the opportunity to learn how to engage in meaningful consultation as required by the federal law and recognizes that additional training opportunities for school directors and school district staff are needed. The legislature finds that ensuring the federal consultation requirements are implemented in a meaningful way will contribute towards helping create a more inclusive educational environment that supports long-term success for all native students.

(2)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, the office of Native education in conjunction with the Washington state Native American education advisory committee, and the Washington state school directors' association shall collaborate, at a minimum, with the tribal leaders congress on education, and any other affected federally recognized tribes that express interest in participating, to develop a tribal consultation training and schedule for purposes of assisting school district board directors and staff in understanding how to engage in the consultation process required under Title VI of the federal every student succeeds act (P.L. 114-95, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 10001 et seq., 20 U.S.C. 6301 et seq.).

(b) The tribal consultation training and schedule created under this section shall be offered by the office of Native education in the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(c) The tribal consultation training and schedule must be developed and finalized by January 1, 2023.

(d) The tribal consultation training must incorporate, at a minimum, the following issues:

(i) Identification of native students, including federal identification guidelines for American Indian and Alaska Native students;

(ii) Data sharing from school districts to federally recognized tribes; and

(iii) Implementation of the tribal history, culture, and government curriculum under RCW 28A.320.170.

(e) The training must be made available to all school district directors and educational service district board members, and it is encouraged that the training also be included in onboarding training for all new school district directors and educational service district board members.

(3)(a) Beginning September 1, 2024, school board members, superintendents, and any other staff at school districts that are required to perform tribal consultation under Title VI of the federal every student succeeds act (P.L. 114-95, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq., 20 U.S.C. 6301 et seq.) must take and certify completion of the tribal consultation training created under this section.

(b) All individuals required to take the tribal consultation training under this section must, at a minimum, renew the certification of completion of the training every three years.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to implement this section.

[ 2022 c 9 s 1.]